Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.901, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Purpose. The commissioner of health deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end conduct maternal death studies to assist the planning, implementation, and evaluation of medical, health, and welfare service systems and to reduce the numbers of preventable maternal deaths in Minnesota.